Utah statutes.
62A-15-702.    Treatment and commitment of minors in the public mental health system.

A child is entitled to due process proceedings, in accordance with the requirements of this part, whenever the child:

(1)  may receive or receives services through the public mental health system and is placed, by a local mental health authority, in a physical setting where his liberty interests are restricted, including residential and inpatient placements; or

(2)  receives treatment in which a constitutionally protected privacy or liberty interest may be affected, including the administration of antipsychotic medication, electroshock therapy, and psychosurgery.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 8, 2002 Special Session 5

